Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.450

Findings of fact—Order—Notice—Report.

(1) In the event of a finding of unprofessional conduct, the board shall prepare and serve findings of fact and an order as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW and the board shall notify the public, which notice must include press releases to appropriate local news media and the major news wire services. If the license, registration, endorsement, or permit holder or applicant is found to have not committed unprofessional conduct, the board shall immediately prepare and serve findings of fact and an order of dismissal of the charges. The board shall retain the findings of fact and order as a permanent record.

(2) The board shall report the issuance of statements of charges and final orders in cases processed by the board to:

(a) The person or agency who brought to the board's attention information that resulted in the initiation of the case;

(b) Appropriate organizations, public or private, that serve the professions; and

(c) Counterpart licensing boards in other states or associations of state licensing boards.

(3) This section does not require the reporting of information that is exempt from public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.

[ 2005 c 274 s 223; 1994 c 17 s 7.]